Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB725.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.17A-661 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(a) 1. A health benefit plan [issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2022,
]that provides coverage for treatment of a mental health condition shall
provide coverage of any treatment of a mental health condition under
terms or conditions that are no more restrictive than the terms or
conditions provided for treatment of a physical health condition.
2. Expenses for mental health and physical health conditions shall be
combined for purposes of meeting deductible and out-of-pocket limits
required under a health benefit plan.
3. A health benefit plan that does not otherwise provide for management of
care under the plan or that does not provide for the same degree of
management of care for all health or mental health conditions may
provide coverage for treatment of mental health conditions through a
managed care organization;
(b) With respect to mental health condition benefits in any classification of
benefits, a health benefit plan required to comply with paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall not impose:
1. A nonquantitative treatment limitation that does not apply to medical
and surgical benefits in the same classification; and
2. Medical necessity criteria or a nonquantitative treatment limitation
unless, under the terms of the plan, as written and in operation, any
processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors used in
applying the criteria or limitation to mental health condition benefits in
the classification are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 225
than, the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors
used in applying the criteria or limitation to medical and surgical
benefits in the same classification; and
(c) Paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be construed to require, at a minimum,
compliance with the requirements for nonquantitative treatment limitations set
forth in the Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, 42 U.S.C.
sec. 300gg-26, as amended, and any related federal regulations, as amended,
including but not limited to 45 C.F.R. secs. 146.136, 147.160, and
156.115(a)(3).
(2) (a) An insurer that issues or renews a health benefit plan that is subject to the
provisions of this section shall submit an annual report to the commissioner
and the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Health Services, on or before June[April] 1 of each year[
following January 1, 2022], that contains the following:
1. A description of the process used to develop or select the medical
necessity criteria for both mental health condition benefits and medical
and surgical benefits;
2. Identification of all nonquantitative treatment limitations applicable to
benefits and services covered under the plan that are applied to both
mental health condition benefits and medical and surgical benefits
within each classification of benefits;
3. The results of an analysis that demonstrates compliance with subsection
(1)(b) and (c) of this section for the medical necessity criteria described
in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph and for each nonquantitative
treatment limitation identified in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, as
written and in operation. At a minimum, the results of the analysis shall:
a. Identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 225
treatment limitation will apply to a benefit, including factors that
were considered but rejected;
b. Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to
define the factors and any other evidence relied upon in designing
each nonquantitative treatment limitation;
c. Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the
analyses, performed to determine that the processes and strategies:
i. Used to design each nonquantitative treatment limitation, as
written, and the as-written processes and strategies used to
apply the nonquantitative treatment limitation to mental
health condition benefits are comparable to, and are applied
no more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to
design each nonquantitative treatment limitation, as written,
and the as-written processes and strategies used to apply the
nonquantitative treatment limitation to medical and surgical
benefits; and
ii. Used to apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation, in
operation, for mental health condition benefits are
comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the
processes and strategies used to apply each nonquantitative
treatment limitation, in operation, for medical and surgical
benefits; and
d. Disclose the specific findings and conclusions reached by the
insurer that the results of the analyses performed under this
subparagraph indicate that the insurer is in compliance with
subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section; and
4. Any additional information that may be prescribed by the commissioner
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 225
for use in determining compliance with the requirements of this section.
(b) The annual report shall be submitted in a manner and format prescribed by the
commissioner through administrative regulation.
(3) A willful violation of this section shall constitute an act of discrimination and shall
be an unfair trade practice under this chapter. The remedies provided under Subtitle
12 of this chapter shall apply to conduct in violation of this section.
Section 2. Whereas parity in the provision of mental health condition benefits is
imperative to the health and well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 5:30 PM Jacketed